North Carolina statutes. Chapter 99E. Special Liability Provisions.
Article 9. Private Pools COVID-19 Limited Liability.

§ 99E-80.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

COVID-19. — The disease caused by the SARS-CoV-2 virus.

Community pool. — A privately owned community swimming pool, including, without limitation, a swimming pool owned or operated by a multiunit apartment complex, homeowners association, or condominium unit owners association.

History.

2020-90, s. 6(a).

§ 99E-81.
Limited liability for reopening community pools.

Owners and operators of community pools and their agents shall not be liable in any claim or action seeking damages for injury or death resulting from transmission of COVID-19 alleged to have resulted from the reopening of the community pool in accordance with applicable executive orders of the Governor.

The immunity provided by this section shall not apply to claims for injury or death resulting from gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing.

History.

2020-90, s. 6(a).

§ 99E-82.
Applicability.

This Article applies to claims or actions arising no later than one year after the expiration or rescission of Executive Order No. 116 issued March 10, 2020.

History.

2020-90, s. 6(a).